Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-607] Liability to other
persons of person dissociated as a general partner. (a) A
person's dissociation as a general partner shall not of itself discharge the
person's liability as a general partner for an obligation of the limited
partnership incurred before dissociation. Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (b) and (c), the person shall not be liable for a limited
partnership's obligation incurred after dissociation.

(b) A person whose dissociation as a general
partner resulted in a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership's
activities shall be liable to the same extent as a general partner under
section 425E-404 on an obligation incurred by the limited partnership under
section 425E-804.

(c) A person that has dissociated as a general
partner but whose dissociation did not result in a dissolution and winding up
of the limited partnership's activities shall be liable on a transaction
entered into by the limited partnership after the dissociation only if:

(1) A general partner would be liable on the
transaction; and

(2) At the time the other party enters into the
transaction:

(A) Less than two years has passed since the
dissociation; and

(B) The other party does not have notice of
the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

(d) By agreement with a creditor of a limited
partnership and the limited partnership, a person dissociated as a general
partner may be released from liability for an obligation of the limited
partnership.

(e) A person dissociated as a general partner
shall be released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership
if the limited partnership's creditor, with notice of the person's dissociation
as a general partner but without the person's consent, agrees to a material
alteration in the nature or time of payment of the obligation. [L 2003, c 210,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next